Hawaii statutes.
§802-11 Appointment of state public
defender. The state public defender shall be appointed by the defender
council without regard to chapters 76 and 89. The state public defender's
appointment shall be for a term of four years except as otherwise provided
herein, and until the state public defender's successor is appointed and
qualified. The state public defender shall be qualified to practice law before
the supreme court of this State. Effective July 1, 2005, the state public
defender shall be paid a salary set at eighty-seven per cent of the attorney
general. The state public defender shall devote full time to the performance
of the state public defender's duties and shall not engage in the general
practice of law. [L 1971, c 185, pt of §1; HRS §705C-11; ren L 1972, c 9, pt of
§1; am L 1975, c 58, §22; am L 1982, c 129, §19; gen ch 1985; am L 1986, c 128,
§18; am L 1987, c 226, §1; am L 1989, c 329, §15; am L 2002, c 148, §46; am L
2005, c 226, §14]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next